Maryland, session 2025, SB0986.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) In this section, “patient navigation” means individualized assistance offered
to a patient with cancer and the patient’s family and caregivers at the health care facility
at which the patient is receiving care.
(b) The Maryland Department of Health, in consultation with stakeholders
including stakeholders with policy, clinical, or personal expertise, shall conduct a study on
patient navigation services that help a patient overcome health care system barriers and
facilitate timely access to quality health and psychosocial care from prediagnosis through
all phases of the cancer experience.
(c) The Maryland Department of Health shall:
(1) in conducting the study required under subsection (b) of this section:
(i) assess the availability of patient navigation services; and
(ii) analyze the barriers to accessing patient navigation services; and
(2) recommend policy, legislative, and budgetary initiatives to improve
patient navigation services in the State.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0986*

SENATE BILL 986
(d) On or before December 1, 2025, the Maryland Department of Health shall
report its findings and recommendations to the General Assembly, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.